en: Liquid Hand Soap
xx: Liquid Hand Soap
cs: Tekuté mýdlo
da: Flydende håndsæbe
de: Flüssigseifen
es: Jabón líquido para manos
fr: Savon liquide pour les mains
it: Sapone liquido per mani
ja: 液体ハンドソープ
nl: Vloeibare handzeep
no: Flytende håndsåpe
pl: Mydła w płynie do rąk
pt: Sabonete líquido para as mãos
ru: Жидкое мыло для рук
sv: Flytande tvål
tr: Sıvı El Sabunu

en: Powdered Hand Soap
xx: Powdered Hand Soap
cs: Prášková mýdla na ruce
da: Håndsæbe i pulverform
de: Seife in Pulverform
es: Jabón de manos en polvo
fr: Savon en poudre pour les mains
it: Sapone in polvere
ja: 粉末ハンドソープ
nl: Handzeep in poedervorm
no: Håndsåpe i pudderform
pl: Mydła w proszku do rąk
pt: Sabonete em pó para as mãos
ru: Порошковое мыло для рук
sv: Handtvål i pulverform
tr: Pudralı El Sabunu

en: Shower Caps
xx: Shower Caps
cs: Sprchovací čepice
da: Badehætter
de: Duschhauben
es: Gorros para ducha
fr: Bonnets de douche
it: Cuffie da doccia
ja: シャワーキャップ
nl: Douchemutsen
no: Dusjhetter
pl: Czepki pod prysznic
pt: Toucas de banho
ru: Шапочки для душа
sv: Duschmössor
tr: Duş Boneleri

en: Bath & Body Gift Sets
xx: Bath & Body Gift Sets
cs: Dárkové koše s drogerií
da: Gavesæt til bad og krop
de: Geschenkkörbe Bad & Körperpflege
es: Cestas de regalo con productos de baño y cuidado corporal
fr: Coffrets cadeaux pour le bain et le corps
it: Cesti con prodotti bagno e corpo
ja: バス・ボディケア用品ギフトセット
nl: Cadeaumanden voor bad en lichaam
no: Gavesett for bad og kropp
pl: Zestawy do kąpieli
pt: Cestas de presentes para o corpo e rosto
ru: Подарочные корзины со средствами для душа и ухода за телом
sv: Presentset för bad och kropp
tr: Banyo ve Vücut Bakımı Hediye Setleri

en: Cosmetic Sets
xx: Cosmetic Sets
cs: Kosmetické sady
da: Makeupsæt
de: Kosmetiksets
es: Juegos de maquillaje
fr: Kits de cosmétiques
it: Kit per il trucco
ja: メイク用品セット
nl: Make-upkoffers
no: Kosmetikksett
pl: Zestawy kosmetyków
pt: Conjuntos de maquiagem
ru: Косметические наборы
sv: Makeupset
tr: Makyaj Setleri

en: Cosmetic Tool Cleansers
xx: Cosmetic Tool Cleansers
cs: Čističe kosmetických nástrojů
da: Rensevæske til kosmetiske redskaber
de: Reiniger für Kosmetikwerkzeuge
es: Productos de limpieza de objetos cosméticos
fr: Nettoyeurs d'outils cosmétiques
it: Pulitori per utensili cosmetici
ja: メイク道具用クリーナー
nl: Reinigingsproducten voor cosmetische hulpmiddelen
no: Rensemidler for kosmetikkverktøy
pl: Preparaty do czyszczenia akcesoriów kosmetycznych
pt: Limpadores de utensílios cosméticos
ru: Средства для очистки косметических инструментов
sv: Rengöringsmedel för sminktillbehör
tr: Kozmetik Alet Temizleyiciler

en: Cosmetic Tools
xx: Cosmetic Tools
cs: Kosmetické pomůcky
da: Kosmetiske redskaber
de: Kosmetik-Zubehör
es: Objetos cosméticos
fr: Accessoires cosmétiques
it: Utensili cosmetici
ja: メイク道具・ネイルケア用品
nl: Cosmetische hulpmiddelen
no: Kosmetikkverktøy
pl: Akcesoria kosmetyczne
pt: Ferramentas cosméticas
ru: Косметические инструменты
sv: Kosmetikverktyg
tr: Kozmetik Aletleri

en: Makeup Tools
xx: Makeup Tools
cs: Pomůcky pro make-up
da: Makeupredskaber
de: Make-up Zubehör
es: Objetos para maquillaje
fr: Accessoires de maquillage
it: Accessori per il trucco
ja: メイク道具
nl: Make-upproducten
no: Sminkeverktøy
pl: Akcesoria do makijażu
pt: Ferramentas de maquiagem
ru: Инструменты для макияжа
sv: Makeupverktyg
tr: Makyaj Aletleri

en: Double Eyelid Glue & Tape
xx: Double Eyelid Glue & Tape
cs: Lepidla a pásky k prodlužování řas
da: Lim og tape til øjenlåg
de: Schlupflid-Kleber & -Klebestreifen
es: Adhesivos y cola de párpado doble
fr: Colle et ruban adhésif pour double paupière
it: Colla e nastro per doppia palpebra
ja: ふたえ用アイリッド・アイテープ
nl: Lijm en tape voor dubbele oogleden
no: Lim og tape til øyelokk
pl: Kleje i taśmy do tworzenia drugiej powieki
pt: Fita e cola para pálpebra dupla
ru: Клей и лента для двойного века
sv: Lim och tejp för dubbla ögonlock
tr: Çift Göz Kapağı Yapıştırıcısı ve Bandı

en: Eyebrow Stencils
xx: Eyebrow Stencils
cs: Šablony na obočí
da: Skabeloner til øjenbryn
de: Augenbrauenschablonen
es: Plantillas para cejas
fr: Pochoirs à sourcils
it: Stampi per sopracciglia
ja: 眉用ステンシル
nl: Wenkbrauwenpotlood
no: Øyebrynsjablonger
pl: Szablony do brwi
pt: Moldes para sobrancelha
ru: Трафареты для бровей
sv: Ögonbrynsstenciler
tr: Kaş Kalemleri

en: Eyelash Curler Refills
xx: Eyelash Curler Refills
cs: Náhradní gumičky do kleští na řasy
da: Curler-refills til øjenvipper
de: Ersatzkissen für Wimpernzangen
es: Recambios para rizapestañas
fr: Recharges de recourbe-cils
it: Ricariche per arricciaciglia
ja: ビューラー用替えゴム
nl: Navullingen voor wimperkrullers
no: Refiller for øyenvippetang
pl: Gumki do zalotki
pt: Refis para curvex
ru: Заправка для завивателей ресниц
sv: Refiller till ögonfransböjare
tr: Kirpik Kıvırıcı Refilleri

en: Eyelash Curlers
xx: Eyelash Curlers
cs: Natáčky na řasy
da: Øjenvippecurlere
de: Wimpernformer
es: Rizador de pestañas
fr: Recourbe-cils
it: Curva ciglia
ja: ビューラー
nl: Oogwimperkrullers
no: Øyevippekrøllere
pl: Zalotki
pt: Curvex
ru: Щипцы для завивки ресниц
sv: Ögonfransböjare
tr: Kirpik Kıvırıcılar

en: Face Mirrors
xx: Face Mirrors
cs: Zrcátka na makeup
da: Makeupspejle
de: Make-up-Spiegel
es: Espejos para maquillaje
fr: Miroirs de maquillage
it: Specchi per il trucco
ja: 手鏡
nl: Make-upspiegels
no: Ansiktsspeil
pl: Lusterka kosmetyczne
pt: Espelhos de maquiagem
ru: Зеркала для макияжа
sv: Ansiktsspeglar
tr: Yüz Aynaları

en: Facial Blotting Paper
xx: Facial Blotting Paper
cs: Obličejový savý papír
da: Trækpapir til ansigtsbehandling
de: Pudertücher
es: Toallitas desmaquilladoras
fr: Papier matifiant pour le visage
it: Foglietti opacizzanti
ja: あぶらとり紙
nl: Blottingpapier voor gezicht
no: Ansiktstrekkpapir
pl: Bibułki matujące
pt: Mata-borrão facial
ru: Впитывающая бумага для лица
sv: Oljeabsorberande papper
tr: Yüz Kurutma Kağıtları

en: False Eyelash Accessories
xx: False Eyelash Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k umělým řasám
da: Tilbehør til kunstige øjenvipper
de: Zubehör für künstliche Wimpern
es: Accesorios para pestañas postizas
fr: Accessoires pour faux cils
it: Accessori per ciglia finte
ja: つけまつげ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor valse wimpers
no: Tilbehør til falske øyevipper
pl: Akcesoria do sztucznych rzęs
pt: Acessórios para cílios postiços
ru: Принадлежности для накладных ресниц
sv: Tillbehör för lösögonfransar
tr: Takma Kirpik Aksesuarları

en: False Eyelash Adhesive
xx: False Eyelash Adhesive
cs: Lepidla na umělé řasy
da: Øjenvippelim
de: Kleber für künstliche Wimpern
es: Cola para pestañas postizas
fr: Colle à faux cils
it: Adesivo per ciglia finte
ja: つけまつげ用接着剤
nl: Lijm voor valse wimpers
no: Lim for falske øyevipper
pl: Kleje do sztucznych rzęs
pt: Cola para cílios postiços
ru: Клей для накладных ресниц
sv: Lim för lösögonfransar
tr: Takma Kirpik Yapışkanı

en: False Eyelash Applicators
xx: False Eyelash Applicators
cs: Aplikátory na umělé řasy
da: Øjenvippeapplikator
de: Applikatoren für künstliche Wimpern
es: Aplicadores para pestañas postizas
fr: Applicateurs de faux cils
it: Applicatori per ciglia finte
ja: つけまつげ用アイラッシュアプリケーター
nl: Applicators voor valse wimpers
no: Applikatorer for falske øyevipper
pl: Aplikatory do sztucznych rzęs
pt: Aplicadores para cílios postiços
ru: Аппликаторы для накладных ресниц
sv: Applikatorer för lösögonfransar
tr: Takma Kirpik Aplikatörleri

en: False Eyelash Remover
xx: False Eyelash Remover
cs: Odstraňovač umělých řas
da: Middel til fjernelse af kunstige øjenvipper
de: Entferner für künstliche Wimpern
es: Disolvente para quitar pestañas postizas
fr: Dissolvant de colle à faux cils
it: Prodotto per rimuovere ciglia finte
ja: つけまつげ落とし
nl: Remover voor valse wimpers
no: Øyevippefjerner
pl: Preparat do usuwania sztucznych rzęs
pt: Removedor de cílios postiços
ru: Средства для снятия накладных ресниц
sv: Borttagningsmedel för lösögonfransar
tr: Takma Kirpik Çıkarıcı

en: Makeup Brushes
xx: Makeup Brushes
cs: Štětce na makeup
da: Makeupbørster
de: Make-up-Pinsel
es: Brochas para maquillaje
fr: Pinceaux de maquillage
it: Pennelli per il trucco
ja: メイクブラシ
nl: Make-upkwasten
no: Sminkebørster
pl: Pędzle do makijażu
pt: Pincéis de maquiagem
ru: Кисти для макияжа
sv: Makeupborstar
tr: Makyaj Fırçaları

en: Makeup Sponges
xx: Makeup Sponges
cs: Houbičky na make-up
da: Makeupsvampe
de: Make-up-Schwämme
es: Esponjas para maquillaje
fr: Éponges de maquillage
it: Spugnette per il trucco
ja: メイクスポンジ
nl: Make-upsponsjes
no: Sminkesvamper
pl: Gąbeczki do makijażu
pt: Esponjas de maquiagem
ru: Губки для макияжа
sv: Makeuptvättsvampar
tr: Makyaj Süngerleri